Hawaii statutes.
[§269-166] Green infrastructure fee; nonbypassable. (a) The
public utilities commission may create, pursuant to a financing order approved
pursuant to section 269-163, a utility-wide nonbypassable surcharge, referred
to as the green infrastructure fee, which shall be deposited into the green
infrastructure bond fund and be pledged to secure and be applied to the
repayment of bonds and related financing costs as described in this part. The green infrastructure fee may be a usage-based surcharge, a flat user fee, or a charge based upon customer
revenues as determined by the public utilities commission for each customer
class in any financing order.

(b) The green infrastructure fee may be
applied to reduce the public benefits fee to be transferred pursuant to section
269-121 if so provided in a financing order. Nothing in this subsection shall
affect the right to impose, collect, and adjust from time to time the green
infrastructure fee as provided in the financing order and this chapter.

(c)
As long as any bonds are outstanding and any financing
costs have not been paid in full, the green infrastructure fee authorized under
any financing order shall be nonbypassable. Subject to any exceptions provided
in a financing order, the green infrastructure fee shall be paid by all existing and future customers of electric utilities or any successors.

(d) The green infrastructure fee shall be
collected by the electric utilities or their successors, as collection agents
for the department or the financing parties, in full through a surcharge, fee,
or charge that is separate and apart from the electric utilities' rates. [L
2013, c 211, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next